New Jersey, session 222, S3575.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a county clerk may require any document submitted to the county clerks office by a business that employs 10 or more individuals to be submitted electronically to the county clerks office in a form and manner as determined by the county clerk. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.